Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB59.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Affordable housing" means a residential dwelling unit reserved for a
household whose income does not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the
median income for the area as set out by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development;
(b) "Local legislative body" means the chief governing body of a city, county,
consolidated local government, urban-county government, charter county
government, or unified local government;
(c) "Religious developer" means a religious institution or any property
developer working on behalf of a religious institution; and
(d) "Religious institution" means a bona fide church, religious denomination,
or religious organization, determined by the Internal Revenue Service to be
tax exempt pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) In an area that has adopted planning and zoning, residential housing developed
by a religious developer shall be considered a permitted use in all residential or
commercial zones and shall not be subject to any permitting or review pursuant to
this chapter by a planning unit, if the following conditions are met:
(a) The development is located on property owned by the religious institution;
(b) The property where the development is to be located was purchased by the
religious institution prior to January 1, 2025;
(c) The development has been approved by the local legislative body having
immediate jurisdiction over the property where the development is to be
located;
Page 1 of 2
SB005910.100 - 258 - XXXX 2/11/2025 3:16 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 59/GA
(d) The development exclusively contains affordable housing; and
(e) The religious developer has obtained all other permits, including building
permits, as required by law.
Page 2 of 2
SB005910.100 - 258 - XXXX 2/11/2025 3:16 PM GA